Maryland, session 2025, SB0773.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
15–118.1.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 692
(A) (1) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO:
(I) INSURERS AND NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLANS THAT
PROVIDE HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS
ON AN EXPENSE–INCURRED BASIS UNDER HEALTH INSURANCE POLICIES OR
CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE; AND
(II) HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATIONS THAT PROVIDE
HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS UNDER
CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE.
(2) AN INSURER, A NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLAN, OR A HEALTH
MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATION THAT PROVIDES COVERAGE FOR PRESCRIPTION
DRUGS THROUGH A PHARMACY BENEFITS MANAGER IS SUBJECT TO THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
(B) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, WHEN
CALCULATING AN INSURED’S OR ENROLLEE’S CONTRIBUTION TO THE INSURED’S OR
ENROLLEE’S COINSURANCE, COPAYMENT, DEDUCTIBLE, OR OUT–OF–POCKET
MAXIMUM UNDER THE INSURED’S OR ENROLLEE’S HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN, AN
ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION SHALL INCLUDE ANY DISCOUNT, FINANCIAL
ASSISTANCE PAYMENT, PRODUCT VOUCHER, OR OTHER OUT–OF–POCKET EXPENSE
MADE BY OR ON BEHALF OF THE INSURED OR ENROLLEE FOR A PRESCRIPTION DRUG:
(I) THAT IS COVERED UNDER THE INSURED’S OR ENROLLEE’S
HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN; AND
(II) 1. THAT DOES NOT HAVE AN AB–RATED GENERIC
EQUIVALENT DRUG OR AN INTERCHANGEABLE BIOLOGICAL PRODUCT PREFERRED
UNDER THE HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN’S FORMULARY; OR
2. A. THAT HAS AN AB–RATED GENERIC EQUIVALENT
DRUG OR AN INTERCHANGEABLE BIOLOGICAL PRODUCT PREFERRED UNDER THE
HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN’S FORMULARY; AND
B. FOR WHICH THE INSURED OR ENROLLEE ORIGINALLY
OBTAINED COVERAGE THROUGH PRIOR AUTHORIZATION, A STEP THERAPY
PROTOCOL, OR THE EXCEPTION OR APPEAL PROCESS OF THE ENTITY SUBJECT TO
THIS SECTION.
(2) IF AN INSURED OR ENROLLEE IS COVERED UNDER A
HIGH–DEDUCTIBLE HEALTH PLAN, AS DEFINED IN 26 U.S.C. § 223, THIS
– 3 –

Ch. 692 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO THE DEDUCTIBLE REQUIREMENT OF THE
HIGH–DEDUCTIBLE HEALTH PLAN.
(C) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A
PERSON THAT PROVIDES A DISCOUNT, FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE PAYMENT, PRODUCT
VOUCHER, OR OTHER OUT–OF–POCKET EXPENSE MADE BY OR ON BEHALF OF THE
INSURED OR ENROLLEE THAT IS USED IN THE CALCULATION OF THE INSURED’S OR
ENROLLEE’S CONTRIBUTION TO THE INSURED’S OR ENROLLEE’S COINSURANCE,
COPAYMENT, DEDUCTIBLE, OR OUT–OF–POCKET MAXIMUM SHALL, WITHIN 7 DAYS
AFTER THE ACCEPTANCE OF THE DISCOUNT, FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE PAYMENT,
PRODUCT VOUCHER, OR OTHER OUT–OF–POCKET EXPENSE, NOTIFY THE INSURED
OR ENROLLEE OF:
(I) THE MAXIMUM DOLLAR AMOUNT OF THE DISCOUNT,
FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE PAYMENT, PRODUCT VOUCHER, OR OTHER OUT–OF–POCKET
EXPENSE; AND
(II) THE EXPIRATION DATE FOR THE DISCOUNT, FINANCIAL
ASSISTANCE PAYMENT, PRODUCT VOUCHER, OR OTHER OUT–OF–POCKET EXPENSE.
(2) A VIOLATION OF PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION IS A
VIOLATION OF THE CONSUMER PROTECTION ACT.
(3) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A CHARITABLE
ORGANIZATION THAT PROVIDES A DISCOUNT, FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE PAYMENT,
PRODUCT VOUCHER, OR OTHER OUT–OF–POCKET EXPENSE TO AN INSURED OR
ENROLLEE.
(D) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, AN ENTITY
SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION MAY NOT DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY SET, ALTER,
IMPLEMENT, OR CONDITION THE TERMS OF HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN COVERAGE,
INCLUDING THE BENEFIT DESIGN, BASED IN WHOLE OR IN PART ON INFORMATION
ABOUT THE AVAILABILITY OR AMOUNT OF FINANCIAL OR PRODUCT ASSISTANCE
AVAILABLE FOR A PRESCRIPTION DRUG.
(2) PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO
PROHIBIT AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION FROM USING REBATES IN THE
DESIGN OF PRESCRIPTION DRUG COVERAGE OR BENEFITS.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 692
(2) “ADMINISTRATOR” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 8–301 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
(3) (I) “CARRIER” MEANS AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THE
JURISDICTION OF THE COMMISSIONER THAT CONTRACTS OR OFFERS TO CONTRACT
TO PROVIDE, DELIVER, ARRANGE FOR, PAY FOR, OR REIMBURSE ANY OF THE COSTS
OF HEALTH CARE SERVICES UNDER A HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN IN THE STATE:
(I) AN INSURER;
(II) A NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLAN;
(III) A HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATION; AND
(IV) ANY OTHER PERSON THAT PROVIDES HEALTH BENEFIT
PLANS SUBJECT TO REGULATION BY THE STATE.
(II) “CARRIER” INCLUDES:
1. A HEALTH INSURANCE COMPANY;
2. A NONPROFIT HOSPITAL AND MEDICAL SERVICE
CORPORATION; AND
3. A MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION.
(4) “COST SHARING” MEANS ANY COPAYMENT, COINSURANCE,
DEDUCTIBLE, OR OTHER SIMILAR CHARGE REQUIRED OF AN ENROLLEE FOR A
HEALTH CARE SERVICE COVERED BY A HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN, INCLUDING A
PRESCRIPTION DRUG, AND PAID BY OR ON BEHALF OF THE ENROLLEE.
(5) “ENROLLEE” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL ENTITLED TO PAYMENT FOR
HEALTH CARE SERVICES FROM AN ADMINISTRATOR OR A CARRIER.
(6) (I) “HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN” MEANS A POLICY, A CONTRACT, A
CERTIFICATION, OR AN AGREEMENT OFFERED OR ISSUED BY AN ADMINISTRATOR
OR A CARRIER TO PROVIDE, DELIVER, ARRANGE FOR, PAY FOR, OR REIMBURSE ANY
OF THE COSTS OF HEALTH CARE SERVICES.
(II) “HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN” DOES NOT INCLUDE A
SELF–INSURED EMPLOYEE PLAN SUBJECT TO THE FEDERAL EMPLOYEE
RETIREMENT INCOME ACT OF 1974 (ERISA).
– 5 –

Ch. 692 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(7) “HEALTH CARE SERVICE” MEANS AN ITEM OR A SERVICE
PROVIDED TO AN INDIVIDUAL FOR THE PURPOSE OF PREVENTING, ALLEVIATING,
CURING, OR HEALING HUMAN ILLNESS, INJURY, OR PHYSICAL DISABILITY.
(B) THE ANNUAL LIMITATION ON COST SHARING PROVIDED FOR UNDER 42
U.S.C. § 18022(C)(1) SHALL APPLY TO ALL HEALTH CARE SERVICES COVERED
UNDER A HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN OFFERED OR ISSUED BY AN ADMINISTRATOR OR A
CARRIER IN THE STATE.
(C) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3) PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, WHEN CALCULATING AN ENROLLEE’S CONTRIBUTION TO AN
APPLICABLE COST SHARING REQUIREMENT, AN ADMINISTRATOR OR A CARRIER
SHALL INCLUDE COST SHARING AMOUNTS PAID BY THE ENROLLEE OR ON BEHALF
OF THE ENROLLEE BY ANOTHER PERSON.
(2) IF THE APPLICATION OF THE THE REQUIREMENT UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION WOULD RESULT IN HEALTH SAVINGS
ACCOUNT INELIGIBILITY UNDER § 223 OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE, THE
REQUIREMENT SHALL APPLY TO HEALTH SAVINGS ACCOUNT–QUALIFIED
HIGH–DEDUCTIBLE HEALTH PLANS WITH RESPECT TO THE DEDUCTIBLE OF THE
PLAN AFTER THE ENROLLEE SATISFIES THE MINIMUM DEDUCTIBLE UNDER § 223 OF
THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE DOES NOT APPLY WITH RESPECT TO THE
DEDUCTIBLE REQUIREMENT OF A HIGH–DEDUCTIBLE HEALTH PLAN IF AN
ENROLLEE IS COVERED UNDER A HIGH–DEDUCTIBLE HEALTH PLAN UNDER 26
U.S.C. § 223.
(3) FOR ITEMS OR SERVICES THAT ARE PREVENTIVE CARE IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 223(C)(2)(C) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE, THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL APPLY REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THE
ENROLLEE SATISFIES THE MINIMUM DEDUCTIBLE UNDER § 223 OF THE INTERNAL
REVENUE CODE.
(D) AN ADMINISTRATOR OR A CARRIER MAY NOT DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY
SET, ALTER, IMPLEMENT, OR CONDITION THE TERMS OF HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN
COVERAGE, INCLUDING THE BENEFIT DESIGN, BASED IN WHOLE OR IN PART ON
INFORMATION ABOUT THE AVAILABILITY OR AMOUNT OF FINANCIAL OR PRODUCT
ASSISTANCE AVAILABLE FOR A PRESCRIPTION DRUG OR BIOLOGICAL PRODUCT.
(E) A THIRD PARTY THAT PAYS FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE IN ANY AMOUNT, OR
PORTION OF THE AMOUNT, OF ANY APPLICABLE COST–SHARING OR OTHER
OUT–OF–POCKET EXPENSE ON BEHALF OF AN ENROLLEE FOR A COVERED
PRESCRIPTION DRUG:
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 692
(1) SHALL NOTIFY THE ENROLLEE WITHIN 7 DAYS OF THE
ACCEPTANCE OF THE FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE OF THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF
ASSISTANCE AVAILABLE AND THE DURATION FOR WHICH IT IS AVAILABLE; AND
(2) MAY NOT CONDITION THE ASSISTANCE ON ENROLLMENT IN A
SPECIFIC HEALTH PLAN OR TYPE OF HEALTH PLAN, EXCEPT AS AUTHORIZED UNDER
FEDERAL LAW.
(E) (F) THE COMMISSIONER MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT
THIS SECTION.
15–1611.3.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A PHARMACY BENEFITS MANAGER
THAT PROVIDES PHARMACY BENEFITS MANAGEMENT SERVICES ON BEHALF OF A
CARRIER.
(B) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3) PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, WHEN CALCULATING A BENEFICIARY’S CONTRIBUTION TO AN
APPLICABLE COST SHARING REQUIREMENT, A PHARMACY BENEFITS MANAGER
SHALL INCLUDE COST SHARING AMOUNTS PAID BY THE BENEFICIARY OR ON BEHALF
OF THE BENEFICIARY BY ANOTHER PERSON.
(2) IF THE APPLICATION OF THE THE REQUIREMENT UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION WOULD RESULT IN HEALTH SAVINGS
ACCOUNT INELIGIBILITY UNDER § 223 OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE, THE
REQUIREMENT SHALL APPLY TO HEALTH SAVINGS ACCOUNT–QUALIFIED
HIGH–DEDUCTIBLE HEALTH PLANS WITH RESPECT TO THE DEDUCTIBLE OF THE
PLAN AFTER THE BENEFICIARY SATISFIES THE MINIMUM DEDUCTIBLE UNDER § 223
OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE DOES NOT APPLY WITH RESPECT TO THE
DEDUCTIBLE REQUIREMENT OF A HIGH–DEDUCTIBLE HEALTH PLAN IF AN
ENROLLEE IS COVERED UNDER A HIGH–DEDUCTIBLE HEALTH PLAN UNDER 26
U.S.C. § 223.
(3) FOR ITEMS OR SERVICES THAT ARE PREVENTIVE CARE IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 223(C)(2)(C) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE, THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL APPLY REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THE
BENEFICIARY SATISFIES THE MINIMUM DEDUCTIBLE UNDER § 223 OF THE
INTERNAL REVENUE CODE.
(C) A PHARMACY BENEFITS MANAGER MAY NOT DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY
SET, ALTER, IMPLEMENT, OR CONDITION THE TERMS OF HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN
COVERAGE, INCLUDING THE BENEFIT DESIGN, BASED IN WHOLE OR IN PART ON
– 7 –

Ch. 692 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
INFORMATION ABOUT THE AVAILABILITY OR AMOUNT OF FINANCIAL OR PRODUCT
ASSISTANCE AVAILABLE FOR A PRESCRIPTION DRUG OR BIOLOGICAL PRODUCT.
(D) A THIRD PARTY THAT PAYS FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE IN ANY AMOUNT, OR
PORTION OF THE AMOUNT, OF ANY APPLICABLE COST–SHARING OR OTHER
OUT–OF–POCKET EXPENSE ON BEHALF OF AN ENROLLEE FOR A COVERED
PRESCRIPTION DRUG:
(1) SHALL NOTIFY THE ENROLLEE WITHIN 7 DAYS OF THE
ACCEPTANCE OF THE FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE OF THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF
ASSISTANCE AVAILABLE AND THE DURATION FOR WHICH IT IS AVAILABLE; AND
(2) MAY NOT CONDITION THE ASSISTANCE ON ENROLLMENT IN A
SPECIFIC HEALTH PLAN OR TYPE OF HEALTH PLAN, EXCEPT AS AUTHORIZED UNDER
FEDERAL LAW.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall apply to all
policies, contracts, and health benefit plans issued, delivered, or renewed in the State on or
after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 3 years and 6 months and, at the
end of July 1, 2029, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall
be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 8 –